Illinois, session 104th, SB1565.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the Truth in 5Politics Act. 6    Section 5. Legislative findings. The General Assembly 7finds:8        (1) Misinformation occurs when people distribute 9    information based on incorrect factual beliefs and do so 10    confidently.11        (2) Misinformation has distorted people's views about 12    consequential issues in politics. The American political 13    system and many campaigns are fraught with misinformation.14        (3) Broadcasters have little power of censorship over 15    legally qualified candidates for public office, so local 16    broadcast television stations have difficulty rejecting 17    these types of advertisements, even if they are blatantly 18    false.19        (4) Social media has affected the distribution of 20    information and has become a viable tool for 21    misinformation and manipulation in campaigns.22        (5) Irrelevant, misleading, and vitriolic campaign 23    communications are prevalent.  SB1565- 2 -LRB104 10231 SPS 20305 b1        (6) Mudslinging can result in disgusted and frustrated 2    voters, diminished civic engagement, and decreased voter 3    turnout in elections.4        (7) Honesty, transparency, civility, and substance are 5    values integral to an ethical campaign. Campaigns for 6    public office should adhere to principles of honesty, 7    fairness, responsibility and respect.8        (8) Campaign communications should present only fair, 9    relevant, and truthful information to the voters for their 10    consideration.11        (9) Because voters must decide for themselves what 12    they believe about a particular candidate, safeguards 13    should be put into place to improve the integrity and 14    accuracy of statements made during campaigns. 15    Section 10. The Election Code is amended by changing 16Sections 29B-5, 29B-10, 29B-20, 29B-30, and 29B-35 and by 17adding Sections 29-1.1, 29-1.2, 29-20.1, 29-20.2, and 29B-6 as 18follows: 19    (10 ILCS 5/29-1.1 new)20    Sec. 29-1.1. False statement to affect a vote; violation.21    (a) As used in this Section:22    "Person" means any natural person, candidate, partnership, 23committee, association, corporation, labor organization, 24political party, or other organization or group of persons,   SB1565- 3 -LRB104 10231 SPS 20305 b1including a political action committee.2    "Recklessly" means when a person acts in conscious 3disregard of the truth or falsity of the statement made, 4published, broadcast, or circulated.5    (b) No person shall intentionally or recklessly make, 6publish, broadcast, or circulate, or intentionally or 7recklessly cause to be made, published, broadcast or 8circulated, in a campaign-related communication a false 9statement designed to affect the vote on any public question 10submitted to the electors at any election or relating to any 11candidate for election to public office.12    (c) A violation of this Section may be enjoined in a civil 13action brought by a candidate against whom a prohibited 14statement is made, a registered voter who signed a petition 15for the initiation of a public question against which a 16prohibited statement is made, a member of the board that 17approved a resolution or ordinance initiating the public 18question against which a prohibited statement is made, or, for 19public questions initiated by the General Assembly, a member 20of the General Assembly. Any violation of this Section shall 21be proven by clear and convincing evidence.22    (d) Any person who violates this Section commits a Class A 23misdemeanor. 24    (10 ILCS 5/29-1.2 new)25    Sec. 29-1.2. Unlawful attempt to affect the outcome of a   SB1565- 4 -LRB104 10231 SPS 20305 b1campaign; violation.2    (a) As used in this Section:3    "Person" means any natural person, candidate, partnership, 4committee, association, corporation, labor organization, 5political party, or other organization or group of persons, 6including a political action committee.7    "Recklessly" means when a person acts in conscious 8disregard of the truth or falsity of the statement made, 9published, broadcast, or circulated.10    "Voting record" means the recorded "yes", "no", or 11"present" vote, or a record from abstaining from a vote, on a 12bill, ordinance, resolution, motion, amendment, or 13confirmation.14    (b) No person shall intentionally or recklessly do any of 15the following to affect the outcome of a campaign for 16political office: 17        (1) serve, or cause another person to serve, as an 18    agent or employee in the election campaign organization of 19    a candidate for the purpose of acting to impede the 20    conduct of the candidate's campaign for nomination or 21    election or for the purpose of reporting information about 22    the candidate without the knowledge of the candidate or 23    the candidate's organization; or24        (2) promise, offer, or give any valuable thing or 25    valuable benefit to any person who is employed by or is an 26    agent of a candidate or a candidate's election campaign   SB1565- 5 -LRB104 10231 SPS 20305 b1    organization for the purpose of influencing the employee 2    or agent with respect to the improper discharge of the 3    employee's or agent's campaign duties or to obtain 4    information about the candidate or the candidate's 5    campaign organization.6    (c) No person shall intentionally or recklessly do any of 7the following to affect an outcome of a campaign for political 8office:9        (1) make a false statement concerning (i) the formal 10    schooling or training completed or attempted by a 11    candidate; (ii) a degree, diploma, certificate, 12    scholarship, grant, award, prize, or honor received, 13    earned, or held by a candidate; or (iii) the period of time 14    during which a candidate attended any school, college, 15    community college, technical school, or educational 16    institution;17        (2) make a false statement concerning the 18    professional, occupational, or vocational licenses held by 19    a candidate or concerning any position the candidate held 20    for which the candidate received a salary or wages;21        (3) make a false statement that a candidate or public 22    official has been indicted or convicted of a theft 23    offense, extortion, or other crime involving financial 24    corruption or moral turpitude;25        (4) make a false statement that a candidate has been 26    indicted for any crime, that a complaint has been filed   SB1565- 6 -LRB104 10231 SPS 20305 b1    against the candidate with the State Board of Elections, 2    that the State Board of Elections has conducted or is 3    conducting an investigation of a candidate, or that a 4    candidate has been the subject of a finding by the State 5    Board of Elections without disclosing the outcome of any 6    legal proceedings resulting from the indictment, 7    complaint, investigation, or finding;8        (5) make a false statement that a candidate or 9    official has a record of treatment or confinement for a 10    mental disorder;11        (6) make a false statement that a candidate or 12    official has been subjected to military discipline for 13    criminal misconduct or dishonorably discharged from the 14    armed services;15        (7) make a false statement identifying the source of a 16    statement, issue statements under the name of another 17    person without authorization, or falsely state the 18    endorsement of or opposition to a candidate by a person or 19    publication;20        (8) make a false statement concerning the voting 21    record of a candidate or public official; or22        (9) post, publish, circulate, distribute, or otherwise 23    disseminate a false statement concerning a candidate if 24    the statement is designed to promote the election, 25    nomination, or defeat of the candidate. 26This subsection does not apply to publishing companies.   SB1565- 7 -LRB104 10231 SPS 20305 b1    (d) A violation of this Section may be enjoined in a civil 2action brought by a candidate against whom a prohibited 3statement is made. Any violation of this Section shall be 4proven by clear and convincing evidence.5    (e) Any person who violates this Section commits a Class A 6misdemeanor. 7    (f) This Section does not apply to a member of the press.  8    (10 ILCS 5/29-20.1 new)9    Sec. 29-20.1. Misleading statement of incumbent status; 10violation.11    (a) As used in this Section, "person" means any natural 12person, candidate, partnership, committee, association, 13corporation, labor organization, political party, or other 14organization or group of persons, including a political action 15committee.16    (b) No person shall, with an intent to mislead a voter in 17connection with the person's campaign for nomination or 18election to a public office or in connection with the campaign 19of another person for nomination or election to a public 20office, assume, pretend, or imply, by his or her statements, 21conduct, or campaign materials, that he or she is the 22incumbent of a public office when that is not true.23    (c) A violation of this Section may be enjoined in a civil 24action brought by a candidate affected by the prohibited 25statement of incumbency. Any violation of this Section shall   SB1565- 8 -LRB104 10231 SPS 20305 b1be proven by clear and convincing evidence. 2    (d) Any person who violates this Section commits a Class A 3misdemeanor.  4    (10 ILCS 5/29-20.2 new)5    Sec. 29-20.2. Libel and defamation in political 6advertising; violation.7    (a) As used in this Section:8    "Libel per se or defamation per se" means a false 9statement imputing (1) the commission of a crime; (2) 10infection with a loathsome communicable disease; (3) an 11inability to perform or want of integrity in performing 12employment duties; (4) a lack of ability or that otherwise 13prejudice a person in the person's profession or business; or 14(5) adultery or fornication.15    "Person" means any natural person, candidate, partnership, 16committee, association, corporation, labor organization, 17political party, or other organization or group of persons, 18including a political action committee. 19    "Recklessly" means when a person acts in conscious 20disregard of the truth or falsity of the statement made, 21published, broadcast, or circulated.22    (b) No person shall intentionally or recklessly publish or 23sponsor the publication in any political advertising or 24electioneering communication of a statement constituting libel 25per se or defamation per se.   SB1565- 9 -LRB104 10231 SPS 20305 b1    (c) A statement published or sponsored by a person against 2himself or herself is not a violation of this Section.3    (d) A violation of this Section may be enjoined in a civil 4action brought by a candidate affected by the prohibited 5statement. Any violation of this Section shall be proven by 6clear and convincing evidence.7    (e) Any person who violates this Section commits a Class A 8misdemeanor.  9    (10 ILCS 5/29B-5)  (from Ch. 46, par. 29B-5; formerly Ch. 10      46, par. 1102)11    Sec. 29B-5. Purpose. The Legislature hereby declares that 12the purpose of this Article is to require encourage every 13candidate for public office in this State to subscribe to the 14Code of Fair Campaign Practices. It is the intent of the 15Legislature that every candidate for public office in this 16State who subscribes to the Code of Fair Campaign Practices 17must will follow the basic principles of decency, honesty and 18fair play in order to encourage healthy competition and open 19discussion of issues and candidate qualifications and 20discourage practices that cloud the issues or unfairly attack 21opponents.22(Source: P.A. 86-873; 87-1052.) 23    (10 ILCS 5/29B-10)  (from Ch. 46, par. 29B-10; formerly Ch. 24      46, par. 1103)  SB1565- 10 -LRB104 10231 SPS 20305 b1    Sec. 29B-10. Code of Fair Campaign Practices. At the time 2a political committee, as defined in Article 9, files its 3statements of organization, the State Board of Elections shall 4give the political committee a blank form of the Code of Fair 5Campaign Practices and a copy of the provisions of this 6Article. The State Board of Elections shall inform each 7political committee that subscription to the Code is mandatory 8voluntary. The text of the Code shall read as follows:9CODE OF FAIR CAMPAIGN PRACTICES10    There are basic principles of decency, honesty, and fair 11play that every candidate for public office in the State of 12Illinois has a moral obligation to observe and uphold, in 13order that, after vigorously contested but fairly conducted 14campaigns, our citizens may exercise their constitutional 15right to a free and untrammeled choice and the will of the 16people may be fully and clearly expressed on the issues.17    THEREFORE:18    (1) I will conduct my campaign openly and publicly, and 19limit attacks on my opponent to legitimate challenges to his 20record.21    (2) I will not use or permit the use of character 22defamation, whispering campaigns, libel, or slander, or 23scurrilous attacks on any candidate or his personal or family 24life.25    (3) I will not use or permit any appeal to negative 26prejudice based on race, sex, sexual orientation, religion or   SB1565- 11 -LRB104 10231 SPS 20305 b1national origin.2    (4) I will not use campaign material of any sort that 3misrepresents, distorts, or otherwise falsifies the facts, nor 4will I use malicious or unfounded accusations that aim at 5creating or exploiting doubts, without justification, as to 6the personal integrity or patriotism of my opposition.7    (5) I will not undertake or condone any dishonest or 8unethical practice that tends to corrupt or undermine our 9American system of free elections or that hampers or prevents 10the full and free expression of the will of the voters.11    (6) I will defend and uphold the right of every qualified 12American voter to full and equal participation in the 13electoral process.14    (7) I will immediately and publicly repudiate methods and 15tactics that may come from others that I have pledged not to 16use or condone. I shall take firm action against any 17subordinate who violates any provision of this Code or the 18laws governing elections.19    I, the undersigned, candidate for election to public 20office in the State of Illinois or chair of a political 21committee in support of or opposition to a question of public 22policy, hereby voluntarily endorse, subscribe to, and solemnly 23pledge myself to conduct my campaign in accordance with the 24above principles and practices.25    I, the undersigned, furthermore understand and confirm 26that I will be subject to the penalties described in Section   SB1565- 12 -LRB104 10231 SPS 20305 b129B-35 for failure to sign and file this document in a timely 2manner, and I understand that I may be subject to the penalties 3listed in Article 29 for violating certain activities 4prohibited by this Code.  5   ..............           ............................... 6      Date                            Signature7(Source: P.A. 103-600, eff. 7-1-24.) 8    (10 ILCS 5/29B-20)  (from Ch. 46, par. 29B-20; formerly Ch. 9      46, par. 1105)10    Sec. 29B-20. Acceptance of completed forms; retentions for 11public inspection. 12    (a) A candidate for public office or the chair of a 13political committee in support of or opposition to a question 14of public policy shall file a completed copy of the Code of 15Fair Campaign Practices with the election authority in which 16the candidate or chair of a political committee resides. The 17completed forms shall be completed and filed not later than 2 18weeks after the submission of the candidate's nominating 19petition or not later than 2 weeks after the chair has 20certified to the State Board of Elections the chair's support 21or opposition to a question of public policy under Section 2228-13. 23    The election authorities shall accept State Board of 24Elections shall accept, at all times prior to an election, all   SB1565- 13 -LRB104 10231 SPS 20305 b1completed copies of the Code of Fair Campaign Practices that 2are properly subscribed to by a candidate or the chair of a 3political committee in support of or opposition to a question 4of public policy, and shall retain them for public inspection 5until 30 days after the election.6    (b) Not later than 2 days after the date upon which the 7completed copy of the Code is required to be filed, the 8election authority shall notify those candidates or chairs who 9have failed to file a completed copy of the Code and shall 10include with the notice a copy of the Code required by this 11Article. The notice shall be sent to the candidate or chairs by 12certified mail, return receipt requested. 13(Source: P.A. 103-600, eff. 7-1-24.) 14    (10 ILCS 5/29B-30)  (from Ch. 46, par. 29B-30; formerly Ch. 15      46, par. 1107)16    Sec. 29B-30. Support or opposition to a question of public 17policy; campaign literature or advertising Subscription to 18Code voluntary. 19    (a) The subscription by a candidate or the chair of a 20political committee in support of or opposition to a question 21of public policy is mandatory voluntary.22    (b) A candidate, or the chair of a political committee, 23who has filed a copy of the Code of Fair Campaign Practices may 24so indicate on any campaign literature or advertising in a 25form to be determined by the State Board of Elections.  SB1565- 14 -LRB104 10231 SPS 20305 b1    (c) A candidate must include in all of the candidate's 2campaign literature and advertising the following statement: 3"I am a candidate for (specify office), and I support the 4accuracy of this message.". 5(Source: P.A. 100-1027, eff. 1-1-19.) 6    (10 ILCS 5/29B-35)  (from Ch. 46, par. 29B-35; formerly Ch. 7      46, par. 1108)8    Sec. 29B-35. Failure to comply. 9    (a) If a candidate fails to file a completed copy of the 10Code with the election authority within 5 days of receipt or 11refusal of the notice required under Section 29B-20, then the 12candidate's name may not appear on the ballot. 13    This subsection does not apply to any candidate of an 14office where the Illinois Constitution prescribes the 15qualifications for candidates to that office but does not give 16the General Assembly the authority to modify or add to those 17qualifications. 18    (b) Any person who has signed and filed the Code of 19Campaign Practices and who violates the provisions of the Code 20of Campaign Practices or subsection (c) of Section 29B-30 21commits a Class A misdemeanor. 22    (c) A violation of this Article may be enjoined in a civil 23action brought by another candidate for the public office that 24was affected by the violation, a registered voter who signed a 25petition for the initiation of the public question, a member   SB1565- 15 -LRB104 10231 SPS 20305 b1of the board that approved the resolution or ordinance 2initiating the public question, or, if the public question was 3initiated by the General Assembly, a member of the General 4Assembly, as applicable. Any violation of this Article shall 5be proven by clear and convincing evidence. 6    Any candidate or chairman of a political committee who 7subscribes to the Code of Fair Campaign Practices and fails to 8comply with any provision of the Code shall not be guilty of a 9criminal offense and nothing in this Article or any other law 10shall be construed to impose any criminal penalty for 11noncompliance with this Article.12(Source: P.A. 86-1435; 87-1052.) 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect February 141, 2026.